Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.050

Application for writ—Notice.

The application must be made on affidavit by the party beneficially interested, and the court may require a notice of the application to be given to the adverse party, or may grant an order to show cause why it should not be allowed, or may grant the writ without notice.

[ 1895 c 65 s 5; RRS s 1003.]